Massachusetts, session 194th, S1186.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Safe” or “safety” the
following definition:
“Victim of human trafficking”, a person who is subjected to the conduct prohibited
under section 50 or 51 of chapter 265 or a victim of “severe forms of trafficking in persons”
under 22 U.S.C. 7102.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 149 is hereby amended by adding the following section:
Section 204: Fair Access to Compensation for Victims of Human Trafficking
of 4

Section 204. (a) A victim of human trafficking shall be eligible to receive compensation
from the division, as defined in section 1 of chapter 258C, for lost income due to deprivation of
liberty, with a maximum award of $25,000. Lost income compensation paid by the division
pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500) per
year for a maximum of two years.
(b) Compensation awarded under this section for lost income, up to $25,000, shall not
count toward the compensation available to crime victims under section 3(a) of chapter 258C.
However, this amount shall count toward the $50,000 maximum award available for victims with
catastrophic injuries under Section 3(a) of Chapter 258C.
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, compensation paid
pursuant to this section shall not be counted as income or an asset for purposes of determining
eligibility for any program that receives federal, state or local funds to the extent permitted by
federal law. Such programs include, but are not limited to, those administered by the following:
the executive office of health and human services, executive office of housing and livable
communities, executive office of labor and workforce development, executive office of veterans
services, executive office of education, executive office of aging and independence, executive
office of public safety and security, executive office of energy and environmental affairs,
executive office for administration and finance, and executive office of technology services and
security.
(d) Given the unique circumstances of human trafficking, the following criteria shall not
bar a victim of human trafficking from obtaining lost income compensation under this section:
of 4

(i) Lack of official employment documentation: A victim of human trafficking is not
required to provide formal employment documentation from an employer. Instead, the victim
may submit alternative evidence of employment as defined in section 3, subsection (b)(2)(D) of
chapter 258C.
(ii) Criminal history or alleged contributory conduct resulting from victimization:
Criminal charges or alleged contributory conduct arising from, related to, or associated with the
claimant’s experience as a human trafficking victim, including, but not limited to, charges under
chapter 94C or charges under section 53(a) and 53A(a) of chapter 272, shall not disqualify the
claimant from receiving lost income compensation under this section or under section 3(a) of
chapter 258C. The application must include a statement, made under penalty of perjury, from the
claimant, or a law enforcement officer, licensed attorney, social worker, or witness to the alleged
crime, explaining the connection between the charges and the claimant’s victimization. The
statement shall not require the claimant to admit to any criminal conduct.
SECTION 3. Section 3 of chapter 258C of the General Laws is hereby further amended
by adding the following sentence to subclause (b)(2)(D):
When compensating a victim of human trafficking for lost income pursuant to section
204 of chapter 149, the division shall:
(i) Within 190 days of the passage of this bill, adopt guidelines that allow it to rely on
evidence other than official employment documentation in considering and approving an
application for lost income compensation. The evidence may include any reliable corroborating
information, including, but not limited to, a statement under penalty of perjury from the claimant,
of 4

a licensed attorney, a mandated reporter, or a witness to the circumstances of the crime, to
demonstrate that the claimant was a victim of human trafficking during the relevant period; and
(ii) Compensate the victim for lost income resulting from the deprivation of liberty
during the crime. Compensation shall be calculated based on the Massachusetts minimum wage
in effect at the time of the trafficking conduct, for up to 40 hours per week.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of chapter 258C of the General Laws is hereby further amended
by adding the following subclauses in paragraph (b)(2):
(J) The division may authorize a cash payment to or on behalf of the victim for job
retraining or similar employment-oriented services.
(K) When compensating a victim of human trafficking for lost income pursuant to section
204 of chapter 149, the division may:
(i) Compensate the victim for lost income directly resulting from the injury, with the
limitation that compensation for lost income shall not extend beyond seven years following the
date of the crime, unless the injury has rendered the victim disabled, as defined in section 416(i)
of Title 42 of the United States Code;
(ii) Compensate a victim who was a minor at the time of the crime, provided the victim is
eligible to receive compensation upon reaching eighteen years of age; or
(iii) Compensate the parent or legal guardian of a victim that was a minor at the time of
the crime and: (a) is hospitalized as a direct result of the crime, provided that the minor victim’s
treating physician certifies in writing that the presence of the victim’s parent or legal guardian at
the hospital is necessary for the treatment of the victim; or (b) died as a result of the crime.
of 4